Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-246
Agricultural projects; loan reports;
public information; borrower's name omitted.

The reports
required pursuant to section 58-245 shall be public information. No such report
shall reveal the name of any individual borrower. The authority shall, following
the close of each fiscal year, deliver to the Governor and to the Clerk of
the Legislature a set of the individual reporting forms from the preceding
year together with the report required pursuant to subsection (2) of section
58-245. The reporting forms
and the report submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically. Any member of the Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of such reports by making
a request to the chairperson of the authority.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 46;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 47;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 85.